California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(1) Services programs designed to help children return to families from which they have been removed, where safe and appropriate, or be placed for adoption or with a legal guardian, or, if adoption or legal guardianship is determined not to be safe and appropriate for the child, in some other planned, permanent living arrangement.

(2) Preplacement preventive services programs, including, but not limited to, intensive family preservation programs designed to help children at risk of foster care placement remain safely with their families.

(3) Service programs designed
 to provide followup care to families to whom a child has been returned after a foster care placement.

(4) Respite care of children to provide temporary relief for parents and other caregivers, including, but not limited to, foster parents.

(5) Services designed to improve parenting skills by reinforcing parents’ confidence in their strengths and helping them to identify where improvement is needed and to obtain assistance in improving those skills with respect to matters such as child development, family budgeting, coping with stress, health, and nutrition.

(6) Infant safe haven programs that provide a way for a parent to safely relinquish a newborn infant at a safe haven designated pursuant to state law.

(c) “Family support services,” as defined by Section 431 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 629a), means community-based services, including mentoring, to promote the safety and well-being of children and families. This includes services designed to increase the strength and stability of families, including adoptive, foster, and extended families, to support and retain foster families so they can provide quality family-based settings for children in foster care, to increase parents’ confidence and competence in their parenting abilities, to afford children a safe, stable, and supportive family environment, to strengthen parental relationships and promote healthy marriages, and otherwise to enhance child development.

(d) “Family reunification services,” as defined by
 Section 431 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 629a), means the services and activities described in Section 629a(a)(7)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code that are provided to a child that is removed from the child’s home and placed in a foster family home or a child care institution or a child who has been returned home and to the parents or primary caregiver of the child, in order to facilitate the reunification of the child safely and appropriately within a timely fashion, and to ensure the strength and stability of the reunification. This includes peer-to-peer mentoring and support groups for parents and primary caregivers, as well as services and activities to facilitate access to and visitation of children with parents and siblings. In the case of a child who has been returned home, the services and activities shall only be provided during the 15-month period that begins
 on the date that the child returns home.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 910, Sec. 50.   (AB 1930)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16602.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 16500, each county that chooses to utilize federal Promoting Safe and Stable Families funds shall establish a local planning body and develop county plans as required by the department. The board of supervisors shall oversee the local planning process and approve each county plan before it is transmitted to the department for approval.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 16500, the county welfare department shall act as the county lead administrative agency to carry out the day-to-day planning activities. The county welfare department shall distribute and account for the program funds allocated to the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 459, Sec. 48.   (AB 212)   Effective October 4, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

16604.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), counties shall spend a minimum of 20 percent of its allocated funds in each of the following categories, for a total of 80 percent:

(1) Family support services.

(2) Family preservation services.

(3) Family reunification services.

(4) Adoption promotion and support services.

(b) A county may be authorized to spend less than 20 percent of funds in one or more of the categories identified in subdivision (a)
 for a limited time period, provided that the department determines in writing that good cause exists for the county’s expenditures and determines the date by which the county shall fully comply with subdivision (a). The department may disallow a county’s claims for costs under this section if the county’s expenditure of funds, as specified in subdivision (a), does not conform to its approved county plan.

(c) Counties may expend the remaining 20 percent of funds not expended pursuant to subdivision (a) and any funds identified in subdivision (b), for any of the categories identified in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 910, Sec. 51.   (AB 1930)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16604.5.

When preparing their needs assessments and plans to implement the federal Family Preservation and Support Act (Sections 430 to 435, inclusive, of the Social Security Act (Subpart 2 (commencing with Section 629) of Part B of Subchapter 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code), as contained in the Omnibus Reconciliation Act of 1993 (Public Law 103-66)), counties shall consider providing an in-home assessment of substance-exposed infants after release from a hospital, as part of the protocols of Section 123605 of the Health and Safety Code. These assessments may be funded using federal Promoting Safe and Stable Families funding, to the extent they are identified in a county’s needs assessment and are part of a county’s program plan, and federal Promoting
 Safe and Stable Families funds are available for this purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 459, Sec. 51.   (AB 212)   Effective October 4, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

16605.

(a) The Kinship Support Services Program provides community-based family support services to relative caregivers and the children placed in their homes by the juvenile court or who are at risk of dependency or delinquency. Relatives with children in voluntary placements may access services, at the discretion of the county.

(b) The counties that elect to participate in the Kinship Support Services Program shall meet the following conditions and requirements:

(1) Have a demonstrated capacity for collaboration and interagency coordination.

(2) Have a viable plan for ongoing financial support of the local kinship support services program.

(3) Utilize relative caregivers as employees of the program.

(4) Have
 strong and viable public or private agencies to operate the program.

(5) Describe how the county will develop and maintain the necessary community supports.

(c) The Kinship Support Services Program shall demonstrate the use of supportive services provided to relative caregivers and children placed in their homes using a community-based kinship support services model. This model shall provide services to relative caregivers that are aimed at helping to ensure permanent family kinship placements for children who have been placed with them by the juvenile court, and to provide family support services that will eliminate the need for juvenile court jurisdiction and the provision of services by the county welfare department.

(d) The program shall provide family support services appropriate for the target populations. These services may include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Assessment and case management.

(2) Social services referral and intervention aimed at maintaining the kinship family unit, for example, housing, homemaker services, respite care, legal services, and day care.

(3) Transportation for medical care and educational and recreational activities.

(4) Information and referral services.

(5) Individual and group counseling in the area of parent-child relationships and group conflict.

(6) Counseling and referral
 services aimed at promoting permanency, including kinship adoption and guardianship.

(7) Tutoring and mentoring.

(e) The Edgewood Center for Children and Families in San Francisco or any other appropriate agency or individual approved by the department in consultation with
 participating counties shall provide technical assistance to the Kinship Support Services Program and shall facilitate the sharing of information and resources among the programs.

(f) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 143.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4.6. LOCAL HEALTH CARE BUDGETING [16800.5. - 16818.]

16800.5.

The State Department of Health Services shall establish data collection and reporting requirements for counties to annually report health expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 719, Sec. 5.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

16800.7.

Agencies responsible for conducting fiscal or program audits or inspections of grants or subventions pursuant to any of the following provisions shall, to the extent practicable and consistent with federal law, endeavor to cooperate and consolidate efforts so as to conduct a single fiscal or compliance audit for any program affected by these provisions, thereby maximizing audit efficiency and minimizing the inconvenience to the program being audited:

(a) The Child Health Disability Prevention
 Program (Article 6 (commencing with Section 124025) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 106 of the Health and Safety Code).

(b) The Maternal and Child Health program as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 27 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The Tobacco Use Prevention program (Article 1 (commencing with Section 104350) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code).

(d) AIDS programs (former Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Division 1 of the Health and Safety Code).

(e) The County Health Care for Indigents program (Part 4.7 (commencing with Section 16900)), including, but not limited to, county health care reporting requirements pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16910) and Chapter 2.5 (commencing with
 Section 16915) of that part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 715.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

16801.

The following definitions shall govern the construction of this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

(a) “County health services” means public health services, outpatient health services, and inpatient health services provided directly by a local jurisdiction or financed or purchased by a local jurisdiction through grants, contracts, or agreements but shall not include mental health services, alcohol and drug abuse services, and services which were provided in fiscal year 1977–78 but were not part of the reported net county costs for fiscal year 1977–78.
 

(b) “Net county costs for health services” means expenditures for county health services, less revenues received for county health services. 

(c) “City health services” means public health services, outpatient health services, and inpatient health services provided directly by the city or financed or purchased by the city through grants, contracts, or agreements, but shall not include mental health services, alcohol and drug abuse services, and services which were not provided in the 1977–78 fiscal year but were not part of the reported net county costs for the 1977–78 fiscal year. 

(d) “Department” means the State Department of Health Services. 

(e) “Net city costs for health services” means expenditures for city health services, less revenues
 received for city health services. 

(f) “Program account” means the County Medical Services Program Account in the County Health Services Fund. 

(g) “Reserve account” means the County Medical Services Program Reserve Account in the County Health Services Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 77.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

16803.

(a) The County Health Services Fund is hereby created, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, is continuously appropriated to the department, without regard to fiscal years, for the purposes of this part. 

(b) The expenditure of funds from the County Health Services Fund shall be made by the State Department of Health Services without regard to fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 611, Sec. 78.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

16804.1.

(a) No fee or charge shall be required of any person before a county renders medically necessary services to persons entitled to services pursuant to Section 17000. 

(b) This section is declaratory of existing law and shall not be interpreted to effect a county’s authority to implement a reasonable sliding fee schedule based on ability to pay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 200.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

16809.

(a) (1) The board of supervisors of a county that contracted with the department pursuant to former Section 16709 during the 1990–91 fiscal year and any county with a population under 300,000, as determined in accordance with the 1990 decennial census, by adopting a resolution to that effect, may elect to participate in the County Medical Services Program. The governing board shall have responsibilities for specified health services to county residents certified eligible for those services by the
 county.

(2) The board of supervisors of a county that has contracted with the governing board pursuant to paragraph (1) may also contract with the governing board for the delivery of health care and health-related services to county residents other than under the County Medical Services Program by adopting a resolution to that effect. The governing board shall have responsibilities for the delivery of specified health services to county residents as agreed upon by the governing board and the county. Participation by a county pursuant to this paragraph shall be voluntary, and funds shall be provided solely by the county.

(b) The governing board may contract with the department or any other person or entity to administer the County Medical Services Program.

(1) If the governing board contracts with the department to
 administer the County Medical Services Program, that contract shall include, but need not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) Provisions for the payment to participating counties for making eligibility determinations as determined by the governing board.

(B) Provisions for payment of expenses of the governing board.

(C) Provisions relating to the flow of funds from counties’ vehicle license fees, sales taxes, and participation fees and the procedures to be followed if a county does not pay those funds to the program.

(D) Those provisions, as applicable, contained in the 1993–94 fiscal year contract with counties under the County Medical Services Program.

(E) Provisions for the
 department to administer the County Medical Services Program pursuant to regulations adopted by the governing board or as otherwise determined by the governing board.

(F) Provisions requiring that the governing board reimburse the state costs of providing administrative support to the County Medical Services Program in accordance with amounts determined between the governing board and the department.

(2) If the governing board does not contract with the department for administration of the County Medical Services Program, the governing board may contract with the department for specified services to assist in the administration of that program. Any contract with the department under this paragraph shall require that the governing board reimburse the state costs of providing administrative support.

(3) The department
 shall not be liable for any costs related to decisions of the governing board that are in excess of those set forth in the contract between the department and the governing board.

(c) Each county intending to participate in the County Medical Services Program pursuant to this section shall submit to the governing board a notice of intent to contract adopted by the board of supervisors no later than April 1 of the fiscal year preceding the fiscal year in which the county will participate in the County Medical Services Program.

(d) A county participating in the County Medical Services Program pursuant to this section, or a county contracting with the governing board pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a), or participating in a pilot project or contracting with the governing board for an alternative product pursuant to Section 16809.4, shall not be relieved of its
 indigent health care obligation under Section 17000.

(e) (1) The County Medical Services Program Account is established in the County Health Services Fund. The County Medical Services Program Account is continuously appropriated, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, without regard to fiscal years. The following amounts may be deposited in the account:

(A) Any interest earned upon moneys deposited in the account.

(B) Moneys provided by participating counties or appropriated by the Legislature to the account.

(C) Moneys loaned pursuant to subdivision (n).

(2) The methods and procedures used to deposit funds into the account shall be consistent with the
 methods used by the program during the 1993–94 fiscal year, unless otherwise determined by the governing board.

(f) Moneys in the program account shall be used by the governing board, or by the department if the department contracts with the governing board for this purpose, to pay for health care services provided to the persons meeting the eligibility criteria established pursuant to subdivision (j) and to pay the governing board expenses and program administrative costs. In addition, moneys in this account may be used to reimburse the department for state costs pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(g) (1) Moneys in this account shall be administered on an accrual basis and notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in this section and Section 17605.051, shall not be transferred to any other fund or account in the State
 Treasury except for purposes of investment as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(2) (A) All interest or other increment resulting from the investment shall be deposited in the program account, notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code.

(B) All interest deposited pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be available to reimburse program-covered services, governing board expenses, and program administrative costs.

(h) The governing board shall establish a reserve account for the purpose of depositing funds for the payment of claims and unexpected contingencies. Funds in the reserve account in excess of the amounts the governing board determines necessary for these purposes shall be available for
 expenditures in years when program expenditures exceed program funds, and to augment the rates, benefits, or eligibility criteria under the program.

(i) (1) Counties shall pay participation fees as established by the governing board and their jurisdictional risk amount in a method that is consistent with that established in the 1993–94 fiscal year.

(2) A county may request, due to financial hardship, the payments under paragraph (1) be delayed. The request shall be subject to approval by the governing board.

(3) Payments made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the program account, unless otherwise directed by the governing board.

(4) Payments may be made as part of the deposits authorized by the county pursuant to
 Sections 17603.05 and 17604.05.

(j) (1) (A) Beginning in the 1992–93 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, counties and the state shall share the risk for cost increases of the County Medical Services Program not funded through other sources. The state shall be at risk for any cost that exceeds the cumulative annual growth in dedicated sales tax and vehicle license fee revenue, up to the amount of twenty million two hundred thirty-seven thousand four hundred sixty dollars ($20,237,460) per fiscal year, except for the 1999–2000, 2000–01, 2001–02, 2002–03, 2003–04, 2004–05, 2005–06, 2006–07, and 2007–08 fiscal years, and all fiscal years thereafter. Counties shall be at risk up to the cumulative annual growth in the Local Revenue Fund created by Section 17600, according to the table specified in paragraph (2), to the County Medical Services Program, plus the additional cost increases in
 excess of twenty million two hundred thirty-seven thousand four hundred sixty dollars ($20,237,460) per fiscal year, except for the 1999–2000, 2000–01, 2001–02, 2002–03, 2003–04, 2004–05, 2005–06, 2006–07, and 2007–08 fiscal years, and all fiscal years thereafter.

(B) For the 1999–2000, 2000–01, 2001–02, 2002–03, 2003–04, 2004–05, 2005–06, 2006–07, and 2007–08 fiscal years, and all fiscal years thereafter, the state shall not be at risk for any cost that exceeds the cumulative annual growth in dedicated sales tax and vehicle license fee revenue. Counties shall be at risk up to the cumulative annual growth in the Local Revenue Fund created by Section 17600, according to the table specified in paragraph (2), to the County Medical Services Program, plus any additional cost increases for the 1999–2000, 2000–01, 2001–02, 2002–03, 2003–04, 2004–05, 2005–06, 2006–07, and 2007–08 fiscal years, and all fiscal years thereafter.

(C) (i) The governing board shall establish uniform eligibility criteria and benefits among all counties participating in the County Medical Services Program listed in paragraph (2). For counties that are not listed in paragraph (2) and that elect to participate pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the eligibility criteria and benefit structure may vary from those of counties participating pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), the governing board may establish and maintain pilot projects to identify or test alternative approaches for determining eligibility or for providing or paying for benefits under the County Medical Services Program, and may develop and implement alternative products with varying levels of eligibility criteria and benefits outside of the County Medical Services Program.

(2) For the 1991–92 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, jurisdictional risk limitations shall be as follows:Jurisdiction AmountAlpine $ 13,150Amador620,264Butte 5,950,593Calaveras 913,959Colusa 799,988Del Norte 781,358El Dorado 3,535,288Glenn 787,933Humboldt 6,883,182Imperial 6,394,422Inyo 1,100,257Kings 2,832,833Lake 1,022,963Lassen 687,113Madera 2,882,147Marin 7,725,909Mariposa 435,062Mendocino 1,654,999Modoc 469,034Mono 369,309Napa 3,062,967Nevada 1,860,793Plumas 905,192San Benito 1,086,011Shasta 5,361,013Sierra 135,888Siskiyou 1,372,034Solano 6,871,127Sonoma 13,183,359Sutter 2,996,118Tehama 1,912,299Trinity 611,497Tuolumne 1,455,320Yuba 2,395,580(3) Beginning in the 1991–92 fiscal year and in subsequent fiscal years, the jurisdictional risk limitation for the counties that did not contract with the department pursuant to former Section 16709 during the 1990–91 fiscal year shall be the amount specified in subparagraph (A) plus the amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (B), minus the amount specified by
 the governing board as participation fees.

(A) JurisdictionAmountMerced 2,033,729Placer 1,338,330San Luis Obispo 2,000,491Santa Cruz 3,037,783Yolo 1,475,620(B) The amount of funds necessary to fully fund the anticipated costs for the county shall be determined by the governing board before a county is permitted to participate in the County Medical Services Program.

(4) The specific amounts and method of apportioning risk to each participating county may be adjusted by the governing board.

(k) The Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts under this section is necessary. Contracts under this section shall be exempt from Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. Contracts of the department pursuant to this section shall have no force or effect unless they are approved by the
 Department of Finance.

(l) The state shall not incur any liability except as specified in this section.

(m) Third-party recoveries for services provided under this section may be pursued.

(n) The Department of Finance may authorize a loan of up to thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for deposit into the program account to ensure that there are sufficient funds available to reimburse providers and counties pursuant to this section.

(o) Moneys appropriated from the General Fund to meet the state risk, as set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (j), shall not be available for those counties electing to disenroll from the County Medical Services Program.

(p) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the County Medical Services Program Account for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. However, interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund from the County Medical Services Program Account. Interest payable shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that will interfere with the carrying out of the object for which the County Medical Services Program Account was created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 9, Sec. 25.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

16809.3.

(a) Beginning in the 1991–92 fiscal year, and in subsequent fiscal years, a county shall pay the amount listed below or as established by the governing board pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 16809.4, to the governing board as a condition of participation in the County Medical Services Program administered pursuant to Section 16809: JurisdictionAmountAlpine $ 661Amador 17,107Butte 459,610Calaveras 30,401Colusa 28,997Del Norte 39,424El Dorado 233,492Glenn 33,989Humboldt 430,851Imperial 249,786Inyo 18,950Kings 195,053Lake 150,278Lassen 17,206Madera 151,434Marin 576,233Mariposa 5,649Mendocino 247,578Modoc 9,688Mono 25,469Napa 142,767Nevada 42,051Plumas 23,796San Benito 37,018Shasta 294,369Sierra 6,183Siskiyou 48,956Solano 809,548Sonoma 718,947Sutter 188,781Tehama 79,950Trinity 8,319Tuolumne 34,947Yuba 101,907(b) Beginning in the 1991–92 fiscal year and in subsequent fiscal years, counties that did not contract with the
 department pursuant to Section 16709 during the 1990–91 fiscal year shall pay the following amount listed below or as established by the governing board pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 16809.4, to the governing board as a condition of participation in the County Medical Services Program, administered pursuant to Section 16809:JurisdictionAmountMerced $488,954Placer 247,193San Luis Obispo 358,571Santa Cruz 678,868Yolo 532,510(c) (1) County amounts specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be paid to the governing board in 12 equal monthly payments or as otherwise specified by the governing board. Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3), a county that does not pay the amounts specified in subdivision (a) or (b) may be terminated from participation in the program.

(2) A county may request, due to financial hardship, that payments specified under subdivisions (a) and (b) be delayed. The request shall be subject to the approval of the governing board.

(3) For the 1991–92 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years, counties that enter the County Medical Services Program shall pay the amount specified in subdivision (a) or (b), as applicable, on a prorated basis, for the number of contracted months of participation in the County
 Medical Services Program.

(d) The payments required by subdivision (c) shall not be paid for with funds from the health account of the local health and welfare trust fund established pursuant to Section 17600.10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 256.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

16809.4.

(a) Counties voluntarily participating in the County Medical Services Program pursuant to Section 16809 may establish the County Medical Services Program Governing Board pursuant to procedures contained in this section. The governing board shall govern the County Medical Services Program.

(b) The membership of the governing board shall be comprised of all of the following:

(1) Three members who shall each be a member of a county board of supervisors.

(2) Three members who shall be county administrative officers.

(3) Two members who shall be county welfare directors.

(4) Two members who shall be county health officials.

(5) One member who shall be the Secretary of the Health and Welfare Agency, or the secretary’s designee, and who shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member.

(c) The governing board may establish its own bylaws and operating procedures.

(d) The voting membership of the governing board shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) All of the members shall hold office or employment in counties that participate in the County
 Medical Services Program.

(A) The three county supervisor members shall be elected by the boards of supervisors of the CMSP counties, with each county having one vote and convened at the call of the chair of the governing board.

(B) The three county administrative officers shall be elected by the administrative officers of the CMSP counties convened at the call of the chair of the governing board.

(C) The two county health officials shall be selected by the health officials of the CMSP counties convened at the call of the chair of the governing board.

(D) The two county welfare directors shall be elected by the welfare directors of the CMSP counties convened at
 the call of the chair of the governing board.

(2) Governing board members shall serve three-year terms.

(3) No two persons from the same county may serve as members of the governing board at the same time.

(4) The governing board may elect a permanent chair.

(e) (1) The governing board is hereby established with the following powers:

(A) Determine program eligibility and benefit levels.

(B) Establish reserves and participation fees.

(C) Establish procedures for
 the entry into, and disenrollment of counties from, the County Medical Services Program. Disenrollment procedures shall be fair and equitable.

(D) Establish cost containment and case management procedures, including, but not limited to, alternative methods for delivery of care and alternative methods and rates from those used by the department.

(E) Sue and be sued in the name of the governing board.

(F) Apportion jurisdictional risk to each county.

(G) Utilize procurement policies and procedures of any of the participating counties as selected by the governing board.

(H) Make rules and regulations.

(I) Make and enter into contracts or stipulations of any nature with a public agency or person for the purposes of governing or administering the County Medical Services Program.

(J) Purchase supplies, equipment, materials, property, or services.

(K) Appoint and employ staff to assist the governing board.

(L) Establish rules for its proceedings.

(M) Accept gifts, contributions, grants, or loans from any public agency or person for the purposes of this program.

(N) Negotiate and set rates, charges, or fees with service providers, including
 alternative methods of payment to those used by the department.

(O) Establish methods of payment that are compatible with the administrative requirements of the department’s fiscal intermediary during the term of any contract with the department for the
 administration of the County Medical Services Program.

(P) Use generally accepted accounting procedures.

(Q) Develop and implement procedures and processes to monitor and enforce the appropriate billing and payment of rates, charges, and fees.

(R) Investigate and pursue repayment of fees billed and paid through improper means, including, but not limited to, fraudulent billing and collection practices by providers.

(S) Pursue third-party recoveries and estate recoveries for services provided under the County Medical Services Program, including the filing and perfecting of liens to secure reimbursement for the reasonable value of benefits
 provided.

(T) Establish and maintain pilot projects to identify or test alternative approaches for determining eligibility or for providing or paying for services.

(U) Establish provisions for payment to participating counties for making eligibility determinations, as determined by the governing board.

(V) Develop and implement alternative products with varying levels of eligibility criteria and benefits outside of the County Medical Services Program for counties contracting with the governing board for those products, provided that any alternative products shall be funded separately from the County Medical Services Program and shall not impair the financial stability of that program.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that the amendment of subparagraph (N) of paragraph (1) in 1995, and the addition of subparagraphs (Q), (R), (S), (T), and (U) in 2006, are declaratory of existing law.

(f) (1) The governing board shall be considered a “public entity” for purposes of Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code, and a “local public entity” for purposes of Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code, but shall not be considered a “state agency” for purposes of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and shall be exempt from that chapter. No participating county shall have any liability for civil judgments
 awarded against the County Medical Services Program or the governing board. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to expand the liability of the state with respect to the County Medical Services Program beyond that set forth in Section 16809. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to relieve any county of the obligation to provide health care to indigent persons pursuant to Section 17000, or the obligation of any county to pay its participation fees and share of apportioned and allocated risk.

(2) Before initiating any proceeding to challenge rates of payment, charges, or fees set by the governing board, to seek reimbursement or release of any funds from the County Medical Services Program, or to challenge any other action by the governing board, any prospective claimant shall first notify the governing board, in writing,
 of the nature and basis of the challenge and the amount claimed. The governing board shall consider the matter within 60 days after receiving the notice and shall promptly thereafter provide written notice of the governing board’s decision. If the governing board contracts with the department for administration of the program in accordance with Section 16809, this paragraph shall have no application to provider audit appeals conducted pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 51016) of Chapter 3 of Division 3 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations and shall apply to all claims not reviewed pursuant to Section 51003 or 51015 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) All regulations adopted by the governing board shall clearly specify by reference the statute, court decision, or other provision of law that
 the governing board is seeking to implement, interpret, or make specific by adopting, amending, or repealing the regulation.

(4) No regulation adopted by the governing board is valid and effective unless the regulation meets the standards of necessity, authority, clarity, consistency, and nonduplication, as defined in paragraph (5).

(5) The following definitions govern the interpretation of this subdivision:

(A) “Necessity” means the record of the regulatory proceeding that demonstrates by substantial evidence the need for the regulation. For purposes of this standard, evidence includes, but is not limited to, facts, studies, and expert opinion.

(B) “Authority” means the provision of law that permits or obligates the CMSP Governing Board to adopt, amend, or repeal a regulation.

(C) “Clarity” means that the regulation is written or displayed so that the meaning of the regulation can be easily understood by those persons directly affected by it.

(D) “Consistency” means being in harmony with, and not in conflict with, or contradictory to, existing statutes, court decisions, or other provisions of law.

(E) “Nonduplication” means that a regulation does not serve the same purpose as a state or federal statute or another regulation. This standard requires that the governing board identify any state or federal statute or regulation that is overlapped or
 duplicated by the proposed regulation and justify any overlap or duplication. This standard is not intended to prohibit the governing board from printing relevant portions of enabling legislation in regulations when the duplication is necessary to satisfy the clarity standard in subparagraph (C). This standard is intended to prevent the indiscriminate incorporation of statutory language in a regulation.

(g) The requirements of the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code) shall apply to the meetings of the governing board, including meetings held pursuant to subdivision (i), except the board may meet in closed session to consider and take action on matters pertaining to contracts and contract negotiations with providers of health care services.

(h) (1) The governing board shall comply with the following procedures for public meetings held to eliminate or reduce the level of services, restrict eligibility for services, or adopt regulations:

(A) Provide prior public notice of those meetings.

(B) Provide that notice not less than 30 days prior to those meetings.

(C) Publish that notice in a newspaper of general circulation in each participating CMSP county.

(D) Include in the notice, at a minimum, the amount and type of each proposed change, the expected savings, and the number of persons affected.

(E) Either hold those meetings in the county seats of at least four regionally distributed CMSP participating counties, or, alternatively, hold two meetings in Sacramento County.
